__1st_try_roman_lexica__/n.lexc
!!!n.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Indf +Poss +1P +2P +3P

LEXICON Root
NPrefix;
N;

LEXICON NPrefix
!Inferred
+N:ā^ N;
+N:a^ N;
+N:br^ N;

LEXICON NInf
+N+Sg:0 #;
!Plurals
+N+Pl:~ea #; !Form with ZWNJ
+N+Pl:^ea #; !Form with no separator
+N+Pl:^an #;
+N+Pl:^t #;
+N+Pl:^yn #;
!Indefinite marker
+N+Indf:^y #;
!Pronominal enclitics
+N+Poss+1P+Sg:^m #;
+N+Poss+2P+Sg:^t #;
+N+Poss+3P+Sg:^š #;
+N+Poss+1P+Pl:^man #;
+N+Poss+2P+Pl:^tan #;
+N+Poss+3P+Pl:^šan #;
!Inferred
+N:^wţ #;
+N:^ym #;
+N:^jat #;
+N:^ynš #;
+N:^a #;
+N:^atman #;
+N:^ynt #;
+N:^am #;
+N:^yntan #;
+N:^y_eayy #;
+N:^ar #;
+N:^aš #;
+N:^at #;
+N:^ad #;
+N:^ayy #;
+N:^a° #;
+N:^eayšan #;
+N:^eayy #;
+N:^wŕy #;
+N:^če #;
+N:^yy_šan #;
+N:^tr #;
+N:^nd #;
+N:^attan #;
+N:^artan #;
+N:^y_eay #;
+N:^k #;
+N:^yytr #;
+N:^atm #;
+N:^yt #;
+N:^yd #;
+N:^atš #;
+N:^e #;
+N:^trea #;
+N:^ary #;
+N:^yš #;
+N:^aty #;
+N:^eay #;
+N:^tryn #;
+N:^y_ea #;
+N:^atšan #;
+N:^wat #;
+N:^wş #;
+N:^yšan #;
+N:^eašan #;
+N:^jmewr #;
+N:^att #;
+N:^wd #;
+N:^ﯾﺶ #;
+N:^yany #;
+N:^anm #;
+N:^yy #;
+N:^yat #;
+N:^ytan #;
+N:^antan #;
+N:^y_am #;
+N:^yan #;
+N:^y_eaytan #;
+N:^my #;
+N:^eayt #;
+N:^adšan #;
+N:^tršan #;
+N:^yy_ea #;
+N:^jaty #;
+N:^eayš #;
+N:^anman #;
+N:^any #;
+N:^eaytan #;
+N:^anšan #;
+N:^yanm #;
+N:^yantan #;
+N:^yman #;
+N:^y_eayman #;
+N:^ayd #;
+N:^yant #;
+N:^y_aš #;
+N:^ay #;
+N:^ady #;
+N:^ant #;
+N:^anš #;
+N:^yy_eay #;
+N:^yny #;
+N:^aym #;
+N:^y_at #;
+N:^yanš #;
+N:^eayman #;
+N:^wdy #;
+N:^kan #;
+N:^wn #;
+N:^wf #;
+N:^wŕ #;
+N:^eaym #;

LEXICON N
raebrd	NInf;
źrr	NInf;
Blu-ray	NInf;
armnstan	NInf;
brxy	NInf;
421	NInf;
palayšgae	NInf;
xwdswzy	NInf;
mndl	NInf;
srafrazy	NInf;
kaẓmyan	NInf;
swrax	NInf;
mwlwdy	NInf;
āen_rbay	NInf;
pwlansky	NInf;
tknsyn	NInf;
nykwkary	NInf;
rđyle	NInf;
mflwk	NInf;
ŕyam	NInf;
pašne	NInf;
nanw'ayŕ	NInf;
wyky_pdya	NInf;
fwrtza	NInf;
čadr	NInf;
šwre	NInf;
tk_alktrwn	NInf;
ajlas	NInf;
šwtzlr	NInf;
alnby	NInf;
gzš	NInf;
grye_kn	NInf;
mħkwm_'lye	NInf;
mtŕaźy	NInf;
mnẓwr	NInf;
bste_bndy	NInf;
rwbat	NInf;
1908	NInf;
flwryda	NInf;
grwgan	NInf;
arźy	NInf;
ŕşr	NInf;
znjyr	NInf;
frħ	NInf;
natwan	NInf;
dr	NInf;
mrdwd	NInf;
jwr	NInf;
martynz	NInf;
a'ane	NInf;
āsya	NInf;
nyme_šb	NInf;
sybl	NInf;
drd	NInf;
pyš_šrţ	NInf;
črx	NInf;
sbţ	NInf;
tlţf	NInf;
tbae	NInf;
dstgyry	NInf;
namlaymt	NInf;
sasanyan	NInf;
mal_altjare	NInf;
made	NInf;
asm_nwysy	NInf;
swže	NInf;
xanm	NInf;
latakya	NInf;
dste	NInf;
myraç	NInf;
t'aml	NInf;
çbt	NInf;
ert	NInf;
tħrk	NInf;
aš'l	NInf;
pys_mykr	NInf;
krnfyld	NInf;
mnyt	NInf;
nẓrsnjy	NInf;
mwzyk	NInf;
daray	NInf;
ħajy	NInf;
bħç	NInf;
darwsaz	NInf;
bnzyl	NInf;
kany	NInf;
mdrk	NInf;
jlyl	NInf;
ŕewe_xane	NInf;
šagrd	NInf;
grdan	NInf;
tħwl	NInf;
kadrbndy	NInf;
šfafyt	NInf;
yewdy	NInf;
asm	NInf;
waže	NInf;
bz	NInf;
nsl	NInf;
baxt	NInf;
aŕrb	NInf;
adward_gry	NInf;
zmyn_lrze	NInf;
wrzš	NInf;
aħmd	NInf;
mħakme	NInf;
dykarmw	NInf;
eyzm_škn	NInf;
abwţalb	NInf;
msale	NInf;
by_rngy	NInf;
al'rb	NInf;
đy_alħje	NInf;
āftab	NInf;
ftne	NInf;
ākatswky	NInf;
šywe	NInf;
alwnd	NInf;
ewadar	NInf;
zwrgwyy	NInf;
mršd	NInf;
zanw	NInf;
tk_rwy	NInf;
ħsab_rs	NInf;
brdgy	NInf;
karāfryny	NInf;
rwkš	NInf;
čţwr	NInf;
anŕlaby	NInf;
ptrwlywm	NInf;
traždy	NInf;
mŕrrat	NInf;
by.am.dblyw	NInf;
trwa	NInf;
by_xrdy	NInf;
zħmt	NInf;
nqme	NInf;
FAT16	NInf;
mrq	NInf;
mħbwb	NInf;
gzarš	NInf;
mrzbndy	NInf;
mw	NInf;
matratzy	NInf;
ħdyç	NInf;
pžwak	NInf;
eyraks	NInf;
saxtn	NInf;
āy	NInf;
bšŕab	NInf;
baŕr	NInf;
dmadm	NInf;
šrŕ	NInf;
k'by	NInf;
plank	NInf;
balzak	NInf;
dmne	NInf;
ħmayt	NInf;
bazgštn	NInf;
tswye	NInf;
XRD	NInf;
kšf	NInf;
aŕşa	NInf;
jam'e	NInf;
amkanat	NInf;
bazāfryny	NInf;
kwlyn	NInf;
mšrw'yt	NInf;
padw	NInf;
amyrkbyr	NInf;
gmyšan	NInf;
pašydgy	NInf;
şeywnyst	NInf;
drāmdn	NInf;
rwšngry	NInf;
sarŕ	NInf;
twsy	NInf;
mħź	NInf;
pašwre	NInf;
kamyaby	NInf;
betan	NInf;
edaytgry	NInf;
şafkary	NInf;
merdad	NInf;
mŕds	NInf;
elak	NInf;
šeryar	NInf;
gwgaml	NInf;
pštk	NInf;
afqany	NInf;
mħyţ	NInf;
snare	NInf;
mnf't	NInf;
r´ys_jmewry	NInf;
ayradgyry	NInf;
xl'	NInf;
jraħ	NInf;
neyb	NInf;
drsty	NInf;
emnw'	NInf;
nwjwany	NInf;
krdan	NInf;
parsy_gw	NInf;
pntagwn	NInf;
mşwbe	NInf;
aqtšašgr	NInf;
čp_gra	NInf;
tnasx	NInf;
gđštgan	NInf;
bqź_bwm	NInf;
natwan	NInf;
brwz	NInf;
šyryn	NInf;
awland	NInf;
dlgan	NInf;
klaebrdar	NInf;
wşyt	NInf;
andls	NInf;
ŕlek	NInf;
darw	NInf;
tfħş	NInf;
tfr'n	NInf;
šbħ	NInf;
enyd	NInf;
bndr	NInf;
aldwz	NInf;
ryzmkalme	NInf;
twçyŕ	NInf;
ādm_rbayy	NInf;
911	NInf;
andwe	NInf;
pwrmħmdy	NInf;
xwdprsty	NInf;
akyp	NInf;
rkn_aldwle	NInf;
swxt	NInf;
ŕbady	NInf;
tfnn	NInf;
đr'	NInf;
qtPartEd	NInf;
astŕrar	NInf;
kaskyd	NInf;
ya'ly	NInf;
ātatwrk	NInf;
tŕşyr	NInf;
mħmdābady	NInf;
mtdyn	NInf;
mjmw'	NInf;
ħšyš	NInf;
laye	NInf;
an	NInf;
pmad	NInf;
earpag	NInf;
anbwe_saz	NInf;
1993	NInf;
tar	NInf;
asfrayn	NInf;
zyan	NInf;
tlgraf_xane	NInf;
bazyaby	NInf;
kmysywn	NInf;
āmly	NInf;
al'ryfy	NInf;
qyrmslman	NInf;
šnasandn	NInf;
mdxl_yaby	NInf;
bdjwr	NInf;
tb'yź	NInf;
mnşb	NInf;
wşal	NInf;
frāwry	NInf;
pyr	NInf;
šaxe	NInf;
majrajwyy	NInf;
šyn	NInf;
tayr	NInf;
dstrs	NInf;
jlylwnd	NInf;
wyar´al	NInf;
tda'y	NInf;
žn	NInf;
trħm	NInf;
nmaz	NInf;
xmyny	NInf;
srgyry	NInf;
qyrzmyny	NInf;
kđa	NInf;
dbyrxane	NInf;
wagđar	NInf;
m'bwd	NInf;
zwrmnd	NInf;
jealt	NInf;
prtŕal	NInf;
nzar	NInf;
qbarzdayy	NInf;
aŕtźa°	NInf;
drmande	NInf;
arzš_gđary	NInf;
mgs	NInf;
xwdrw	NInf;
şrb	NInf;
altja	NInf;
dm_krde	NInf;
kekšan	NInf;
fwtbalyst	NInf;
47	NInf;
amyrms'wd	NInf;
kštargae	NInf;
asklt	NInf;
bmb_afkn	NInf;
mħmdħsn	NInf;
kle_pz	NInf;
angyxtn	NInf;
ftne	NInf;
1918	NInf;
blqwr	NInf;
āyslnd	NInf;
karmnd	NInf;
brlyn	NInf;
trs	NInf;
engame	NInf;
tywb	NInf;
n'mt_alle	NInf;
maeyt	NInf;
flany	NInf;
mafat	NInf;
mţr	NInf;
šrwe	NInf;
pwrana	NInf;
lp_eayt	NInf;
jalb	NInf;
qz	NInf;
gwy	NInf;
syzm	NInf;
xwnxwaey	NInf;
ytym	NInf;
twafŕ	NInf;
ywng	NInf;
ŕalb	NInf;
drem	NInf;
pntywm	NInf;
by_xrdy	NInf;
qţfany	NInf;
alktrwd	NInf;
syf_aldyn	NInf;
tmkyn	NInf;
bea	NInf;
xwr	NInf;
mzmze	NInf;
ŕwl	NInf;
āba	NInf;
srkwft	NInf;
xsrwy	NInf;
bna	NInf;
mŕn'e	NInf;
paytxt	NInf;
astmna°	NInf;
axttamye	NInf;
prwrš_dende	NInf;
rmzxwany	NInf;
pdydaršnasy	NInf;
bxt	NInf;
almpyk	NInf;
tnŕyħ	NInf;
prdaxt_knnde	NInf;
fylm_sazy	NInf;
jwrj	NInf;
filevault	NInf;
karn	NInf;
beayy	NInf;
yksan_sazy	NInf;
ħwl	NInf;
pyšgyry	NInf;
krde	NInf;
sfyne	NInf;
mẓer	NInf;
kam	NInf;
qrwrāfryn	NInf;
nŕdy	NInf;
aħtraz	NInf;
škl_gyry	NInf;
panaswnyk	NInf;
beram	NInf;
31/10/1917	NInf;
ālfwnsw	NInf;
ħsn_zade	NInf;
msyr	NInf;
gyns	NInf;
sd	NInf;
elykwptr	NInf;
radyatwr	NInf;
fabyw	NInf;
mdrnyzasywn	NInf;
tđkr	NInf;
aqfal	NInf;
13	NInf;
ţlaŕ	NInf;
aymn	NInf;
wzne	NInf;
baba	NInf;
nţfe	NInf;
ţaŕ	NInf;
gft	NInf;
ħrf_našnwy	NInf;
m'đrt_xwaey	NInf;
eyat_mdyre	NInf;
pwnd	NInf;
bar	NInf;
1736	NInf;
rygan	NInf;
wkyl	NInf;
darwnma	NInf;
škar	NInf;
ram_alle	NInf;
šela	NInf;
saman	NInf;
mwtwr	NInf;
713	NInf;
25	NInf;
ejran	NInf;
nadya	NInf;
srmnšy	NInf;
fayrfaks	NInf;
fr'	NInf;
ssty	NInf;
krbla	NInf;
čkš	NInf;
samane	NInf;
jmyle	NInf;
balq	NInf;
azgyl	NInf;
fźapyma	NInf;
em_trazy	NInf;
msjdsazy	NInf;
swyys	NInf;
gsl	NInf;
flsţyn	NInf;
aħźarye	NInf;
ardwgae	NInf;
txţ´e	NInf;
āb_nma	NInf;
kmsywn	NInf;
wly_n'mt	NInf;
reayy	NInf;
tnxwae_grdan	NInf;
ŕdm_rnje	NInf;
akmal	NInf;
qđa	NInf;
zmre	NInf;
sŕwţ	NInf;
dwmynyk	NInf;
aftraŕ	NInf;
brsam	NInf;
aspan	NInf;
fyçaqwrç	NInf;
b'_b'	NInf;
alws	NInf;
wb_mstr	NInf;
bywšymy	NInf;
jdyt	NInf;
reyaft	NInf;
ŕble	NInf;
ŕm	NInf;
tams	NInf;
mraj'	NInf;
mnjmyn	NInf;
wfadar	NInf;
srxk	NInf;
aš'e	NInf;
nħryr	NInf;
metab	NInf;
pyade	NInf;
syae_rwzy	NInf;
majrajw	NInf;
lydr	NInf;
tmdyd	NInf;
kaeš_dendgy	NInf;
tyraž	NInf;
mae	NInf;
tšryf_frmayy	NInf;
swrax	NInf;
čearpa	NInf;
tkrar	NInf;
nmaye_gđary	NInf;
yasyn	NInf;
nwāwry	NInf;
t'myrkar	NInf;
tkwandw	NInf;
saln	NInf;
āpwlw	NInf;
ħyź	NInf;
nyt_xwany	NInf;
āmar	NInf;
rwgđr	NInf;
dremy	NInf;
narźayty	NInf;
blagr	NInf;
bnyadkar	NInf;
baygany	NInf;
ardybešt	NInf;
waže	NInf;
l'nt	NInf;
nwtrwn	NInf;
ŕfs	NInf;
mħyţy	NInf;
mlat	NInf;
62	NInf;
ħajy_pwr	NInf;
āzmnd	NInf;
sa´wtam	NInf;
by_wjdany	NInf;
ātškde	NInf;
meajr	NInf;
aħŕaf	NInf;
yk_yk	NInf;
kyš	NInf;
awnyfwrm	NInf;
mynakary	NInf;
đenyt	NInf;
āšpzxane	NInf;
mraħ	NInf;
f'al_sazy	NInf;
taxt	NInf;
kesar	NInf;
klafgy	NInf;
txm	NInf;
alxwajة	NInf;
myan_trm	NInf;
ŕewe_xane	NInf;
rmzgđary	NInf;
mnwyat	NInf;
askle	NInf;
dwdman	NInf;
santy_mtry	NInf;
pswrd	NInf;
ampratwry	NInf;
ŕwč	NInf;
mħwry	NInf;
lţfy	NInf;
nymsal	NInf;
nadal	NInf;
nwysndgy	NInf;
āb_mywe	NInf;
kantrbry	NInf;
dsyse	NInf;
tbsm	NInf;
jwk	NInf;
ţlafrwš	NInf;
mšqle	NInf;
endwstan	NInf;
1900	NInf;
sandlr	NInf;
trwr	NInf;
astxraj	NInf;
tdark	NInf;
štab	NInf;
ašraf	NInf;
nyazy	NInf;
ge_gae	NInf;
amrwz	NInf;
ħŕyŕy	NInf;
ywn	NInf;
by_anşafy	NInf;
wanylyn	NInf;
rwzname_frwšy	NInf;
ŕal	NInf;
dlar	NInf;
yçrb	NInf;
ršt	NInf;
pst_mdrnysm	NInf;
